Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6906
Governmental plan, defined.

Governmental plan means a plan as defined under 29 U.S.C. 1002 and any plan maintained for its employees by the United States Government or by any agency or instrumentality of the United States Government.

Laws 1997, LB 862, § 6.